Florida, session 2026, SB452.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSection 25.396, Florida Statutes, is created to 19 read: 20 25.396âFamily court report cards.â 21 (1)âANNUAL PUBLICATION.âBeginning July 1, 2027, and 22 annually each July 1 thereafter, the Office of the State Courts 23 Administrator shall prepare and publish on its website an annual 24 family court report card for each individual family court judge 25 in each judicial circuit. 26 (2)âPURPOSE.âThe report card is intended to promote 27 transparency, accountability, and public confidence in the 28 family law system by providing standardized performance metrics 29 regarding case management, timeliness, and outcomes. 30 (3)âMETRICS.âAt a minimum, each report card must include 31 all of the following: 32 (a)âThe average time to final judgment in dissolution and 33 time-sharing cases. 34 (b)âThe percentage of cases resolved through mediation or 35 settlement. 36 (c)âThe number and percentage of cases requiring court 37 appointed psychological evaluations. 38 (d)âThe average cost to parties for court-appointed 39 professionals, if such data is available. 40 (e)âThe rate of post-judgment modifications within 3 years 41 after entry of final judgment. 42 (f)âCompliance rate with statutory timeframes for rulings 43 on motions and reports. 44 (g)âThe aggregate reversal rate on appeal in family law 45 cases. 46 (4)âPUBLIC ACCESS.âThe Office of the State Courts 47 Administrator shall maintain a publicly accessible, searchable, 48 online database of report cards and submit an annual summary to 49 the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 50 Representatives. 51 (5)âCONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION.âReport cards may not contain 52 personal identifying information about litigants or minor 53 children. 54 (6)âRULEMAKING.âThe Supreme Court may adopt rules to 55 implement this section, including data collection and reporting 56 standards. 57 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.